Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-311
Registration of
elector; personal application; place or time.

Any
elector may personally apply to register to vote at (1) the office of the
election commissioner or county clerk, (2) a registration site at which a
deputy registrar is in attendance, (3) a department listed in section 32-310
at the time of an application, review, or change of address as provided in
such section, or (4) the Department of Motor Vehicles while
applying for a motor vehicle operator's license or state identification card
as provided in section 32-308.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 73;

Laws 2014, LB661, § 6.